Washington statutes.
RCW 41.56.035

Information to be provided to exclusive bargaining representative by employer.

(1) If the employer has the information in the employer's records, the employer shall provide to the exclusive bargaining representative the following information for each employee in an appropriate bargaining unit:

(a) The employee's name and date of hire;

(b) The employee's contact information, including: (i) Cellular, home, and work telephone numbers; (ii) work and the most up-to-date personal email addresses; and (iii) home address or personal mailing address; and

(c) Employment information, including the employee's job title, salary or rate of pay, and worksite location or duty station.

(2) The employer must provide the information to the exclusive bargaining representative in an editable digital file format:

(a) Within 21 business days from the date of hire for a newly hired employee in an appropriate bargaining unit; and

(b) Every 120 business days for all employees in an appropriate bargaining unit.

(3) When there is a state-level representative of the exclusive bargaining representative for a bargaining unit, the employer may provide the information to the state-level representative.

(4) The exclusive bargaining representative may use the information provided under this section only for representation purposes. This section does not give authority to any exclusive bargaining representative to sell or provide access to lists of employees or the information provided to the exclusive bargaining representative pursuant to this section requested for commercial purposes.

(5) If an employer fails to comply with this section, the exclusive bargaining representative may bring a court action to enforce compliance. The court may order the employer to pay costs and reasonable attorneys' fees incurred by the exclusive bargaining representative.

(6)(a) This section does not apply to an employer specifically prohibited under its requirements as a cleared United States department of defense contractor from providing the employee information listed under subsection (1) of this section only for those employees covered by such requirements. The employer is required to provide the employee information under subsection (1) of this section for all employees not covered by the employer's requirements as a cleared United States department of defense contractor.

(b) This subsection (6) does not limit the employee information an employer must provide an exclusive bargaining representative pursuant to its duty to bargain in good faith or any other duty or obligation under applicable collective bargaining law, nor does this subsection (6) prohibit bargaining over the provision of employee information under applicable collective bargaining law.

[ 2023 c 204 s 1.]